North Carolina statutes. Chapter 76A. Navigation and Pilotage Commissions.
Article 6. Commission Funds.

§ 76A-54.
Expenses of the Commission.

The pilots’ association shall pay to the Commission, according to rules prescribed by the Commission, a percentage of all pilotage fees not to exceed two percent (2%) per annum for the purpose of providing funds to defray the necessary expense of the Commission. The appropriate percentage shall be set on an annual basis by the Commission. The fees paid shall be deposited to a special account with the State Treasurer in the name of the Commission and shall be administered by the Secretary of Commerce. Surpluses in the account in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) at the end of the fiscal year shall be returned to the pilots’ association on a prorated basis determined and distributed by the Commission. That the Commission in carrying out its duties may incur necessary legal and auditing expenses and expenses for its travel and investigations which in addition to the one hundred dollar ($100.00) per meeting fee and other allowances allowed by law shall be paid from the foregoing funds.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1176, s. 1.